Kentucky statutes. TITLE XIV Libraries And Archives
Abraham Lincoln Bicentennial Commission

171.347.
Commonwealth of Kentucky Abraham Lincoln Bicentennial Commission — Membership.

There is created the Commonwealth of Kentucky Abraham Lincoln Bicentennial Commission, which shall be attached to the Kentucky Historical Society for administrative purposes. The commission shall be composed of twenty (20) members, as follows:

Two (2) members of the House of Representatives, appointed by the Speaker of the House;

Two (2) members of the Senate, appointed by the President of the Senate;

The secretary of the Education and Labor Cabinet, or his or her designee;

One (1) member from the Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet, appointed by the secretary of that cabinet;

One (1) member from the Kentucky Historical Society, appointed by the executive director of that agency;

One (1) member from the Kentucky Heritage Council, appointed by the executive director of that agency;

One (1) member from the Kentucky African-American Heritage Commission, appointed by the head of that agency;

One (1) member from the Kentucky Humanities Council, appointed by the executive director of that agency;

One (1) member from the Abraham Lincoln Bicentennial Commission established by the United States Congress, appointed by the concurrence of the chairs of that agency;

The Larue County judge/executive, or his or her designee;

One (1) member from the Abraham Lincoln Birthplace, appointed by the superintendent of that national historic site;

One (1) member from the Lincoln Museum in Hodgenville, appointed by the president of that agency;

One (1) member from the Mary Todd Lincoln House in Lexington, appointed by the head of that agency;

One (1) member from the Farmington Historic Home museum in Louisville, appointed by the head of that agency; and

Four (4) citizen members from the state at large with a demonstrated interest in history and substantial knowledge and appreciation of Abraham Lincoln, appointed by the Governor.

The chair of the commission shall be elected from among the membership by the commission members.

History.

Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 96, § 1, effective June 20, 2005; 2006, ch. 211, § 109, effective July 12, 2006; 2009, ch. 11, § 55, effective June 25, 2009; 2009, ch. 16, § 44, effective June 25, 2009; 2015 ch. 69, § 9, effective June 24, 2015; 2022 ch. 236, § 89, effective July 1, 2022.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(6/20/2005). 2005 Ky. Acts chs. 11,
85,
95,
97,
98,
99,
123, and
181 instruct the Reviser of Statutes to correct statutory references to agencies and officers whose names have been changed in 2005 legislation confirming the reorganization of the executive branch. Such a correction has been made in this section.

171.348.
Duties of Kentucky Abraham Lincoln Bicentennial Commission.

The Commonwealth of Kentucky Abraham Lincoln Bicentennial Commission shall:

Study and recommend activities that may be carried out by the Commonwealth of Kentucky to honor Abraham Lincoln on the occasion of the bicentennial anniversary of his birth;

Educate Kentucky residents and the nation about the life of Abraham Lincoln during the years he resided in and visited the state in which he was born;

Assist local governments and organizations with planning, preparation, and grant applications for bicentennial events and projects;

Coordinate federal, state, and local bicentennial activities occurring in Kentucky;

Plan and implement appropriate events, including celebrations and educational initiatives, to commemorate the bicentennial;

Perform other duties as necessary to highlight Kentucky’s role in the life of Abraham Lincoln; and

Seek federal grants and philanthropic support for bicentennial activities.

History.

Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 96, § 2, effective June 20, 2005.

171.349.
Commission to expire on June 30, 2010.

The Commonwealth of Kentucky Abraham Lincoln Bicentennial Commission shall expire on June 30, 2010.

History.

Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 96, § 3, effective June 20, 2005.

171.350.
Depository libraries for reports and publications of state agencies. [Repealed.]

171.360.
Supplying reports and publications to central depository; distribution to college, university and other depository libraries. [Repealed.]

171.370.
Lists of reports and publications. [Repealed.]

171.380.
Statutory limitations on number of copies published not applicable. [Repealed.]